Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2241.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 6073XS (5) 91 mb/jh S.F. 2241 Section 1. Section 256.9, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsections: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 80. Notify school districts of the amount 3 of resident students enrolled in a charter school under chapter 4 256E prior to the beginning of the school year. 5 NEW SUBSECTION . 81. Report to school districts the amount 6 of resident students who withdrew from a charter school under 7 chapter 256E and reentered the public school district during 8 the school year, indicating whether the studentâs return to a 9 public school was voluntary. 10 Sec. 2. Section 256E.4, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 11 following new subsection: 12 NEW SUBSECTION . 8A. The state board shall not approve 13 a charter school application under this section if doing so 14 would result in more than one charter school per ten thousand 15 students statewide in the grade level groupings of elementary, 16 middle, or high school. 17 Sec. 3. Section 256E.5, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 18 following new subsection: 19 NEW SUBSECTION . 7A. The state board shall not approve 20 a charter school application under this section if doing so 21 would result in more than one charter school per ten thousand 22 students statewide in the grade level groupings of elementary, 23 middle, or high school. 24 Sec. 4. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 25 by adding the following new paragraphs: 26 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0v. Be subject to and comply with the 27 restrictions regarding the use of public funds for public 28 purposes under chapters 11, 274, and 279 in the same manner as 29 a school district. 30 NEW PARAGRAPH . 00v. Require each pupil to take all 31 applicable state and federally required student assessments and 32 report the results of those assessments to the pupilâs parents 33 or guardians and to the department of education, in the same 34 manner as a school district. 35 -1- LSB 6073XS (5) 91 mb/jh 1/ 8 S.F. 2241 Sec. 5. Section 256E.7, subsection 6, Code 2026, is amended 1 to read as follows: 2 6. A charter school shall enroll an eligible student who 3 submits a timely application unless the number of applications 4 exceeds the capacity of a program, class, grade level, or 5 building. In this case, students must be accepted by lot. 6 Upon enrollment of an eligible student, the charter school 7 shall notify the department and public school district of 8 residence not later than March 1 of the school year preceding 9 the school year of enrollment. 10 Sec. 6. Section 256E.7, subsection 11, Code 2026, is amended 11 by striking the subsection and inserting in lieu thereof the 12 following: 13 11. The governing board of a charter school shall be 14 composed in accordance with all of the following: 15 a. All members of the governing board shall be residents of 16 this state. 17 b. At least fifty percent of the membership of the governing 18 board shall be parents or legal guardians of students currently 19 enrolled in the charter school. 20 c. At least one member of the governing board shall be a 21 representative of the school district in which the charter 22 school is physically located. The representative shall be a 23 voting member of the governing board. 24 Sec. 7. Section 256E.7, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 25 following new subsections: 26 NEW SUBSECTION . 13. The governing board of a charter school 27 shall select and retain independent auditors and legal counsel. 28 A management entity shall not select the independent auditor or 29 legal counsel of the charter school. 30 NEW SUBSECTION . 14. Each charter school governing board 31 shall report to the department the amount of resident students 32 who withdrew from the charter school and reentered a public 33 school during the school year, indicating whether the studentâs 34 return to a public school was voluntary. 35 -2- LSB 6073XS (5) 91 mb/jh 2/ 8 S.F. 2241 Sec. 8. Section 256E.10, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 1 following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 14. The state board shall develop and 3 implement oversight standards and procedures that provide for 4 all of the following: 5 a. Regular monitoring, including periodic on-site visits, 6 data validation, and annual performance reports evaluating 7 a charter schoolâs academic, financial, and operational 8 performance. 9 b. Differentiated oversight and monitoring based on a 10 charter schoolâs performance, including enhanced monitoring 11 for schools that fail to meet performance expectations or meet 12 compliance standards. Such monitoring may include corrective 13 action plans, probationary status, or nonrenewal of a charter 14 school contract. 15 Sec. 9. Section 256E.12, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 16 to read as follows: 17 1. Each charter school shall prepare and file an annual 18 report with the department. The department shall prescribe 19 by rule the required contents of the report, but each such 20 report shall include information regarding student achievement, 21 including annual academic growth and proficiency, graduation 22 rates, and financial performance and sustainability. Financial 23 performance reporting shall include detailed information 24 regarding the charter schoolâs revenues and expenditures, 25 including salaries and benefits, management or administrative 26 fees, contractual payments, and any profits, surpluses, or 27 other financial benefits realized by a founding or managing 28 entity, including an education management organization or 29 charter management organization, as well as any related-party 30 transactions. The reports are public records and the 31 examination, publication, and dissemination of the reports are 32 governed by the provisions of chapter 22 . 33 Sec. 10. Section 256E.12, Code 2026, is amended by adding 34 the following new subsection: 35 -3- LSB 6073XS (5) 91 mb/jh 3/ 8 S.F. 2241 NEW SUBSECTION . 3. Each charter school shall annually 1 report to the department the number of resident students who 2 applied for admission and the number of resident students who 3 were denied admission. The report must include the reason for 4 each denial. Personal information regarding an applicant in 5 a report submitted pursuant to this subsection shall be kept 6 confidential as required under the federal Family Educational 7 Rights and Privacy Act, 20 U.S.C. Â§1232g, and in the same 8 manner as personal information in student records maintained, 9 created, collected, or assembled by or for a school corporation 10 or educational institution in accordance with section 22.7, 11 subsection 1. 12 Sec. 11. 2013 Iowa Acts, chapter 121, section 73, subsection 13 2, is amended to read as follows: 14 2. The department shall develop an achievement score that 15 calculates aggregate growth as well as aggregate proficiency 16 of students which when combined with other academic indicators 17 results in an overall school performance grade for each 18 attendance center in the school district. For purposes of 19 calculating the performance grade, a student dropping out of 20 an accredited nonpublic school, a charter school established 21 pursuant to chapter 256E, or a charter school or innovation 22 zone school established pursuant to chapter 256F, shall not 23 adversely affect the performance grade of the studentâs school 24 district of residence. The performance grade may also be used 25 as one measure to rank and classify schools into six different 26 performance categories: exceptional, high performing, 27 commendable, acceptable, needs improvement, and priority. 28 The categories may be used to define support and specialized 29 assistance to schools classified as needs improvement or 30 priority as well as to recognize schools designated exceptional 31 or high performing. Additionally, a closing gap score shall 32 be calculated as another measure to determine subgroup 33 performance and to rank and classify attendance centers. Other 34 academic indicators shall be defined as criterion referenced 35 -4- LSB 6073XS (5) 91 mb/jh 4/ 8 S.F. 2241 variables that will be utilized in the calculation of the 1 performance grade. Other academic indicators shall include 2 but not be limited to graduation rates, attendance rates, and 3 college-readiness rates. Additional indicators of academic 4 success and progress may include post-graduation data, 5 suspension and expulsion rates, levels of student engagement, 6 parent satisfaction, parent engagement, and staff working 7 conditions. 8